Hawaii statutes.
§383-68 Contribution rate schedules; fund
solvency rate schedule; rates based on experience. (a) Before
December 31 of each year the fund solvency contribution rate applicable
for the following calendar year shall be determined on the basis of the relationship
between the most recent current reserve fund and the most recent adequate
reserve fund. The fund solvency contribution rate shall apply for calendar
years 1985 through 1991 and shall be that rate that appears on the same line as
the ratio (rounded to the nearest hundredth) of the current reserve fund to the
adequate reserve fund in the fund solvency contribution rate schedule set forth
in this paragraph.

FUND SOLVENCY
CONTRIBUTION RATE SCHEDULE

Ratio of Current Reserve Fund Fund Solvency

to Adequate Reserve Fund Contribution Rate

2.00 or more - .5 per cent

1.50 to 1.99 - .2 per cent

1.00 to 1.49 0

.90 to .99 + .4 per cent

.80 to .89 + .8 per cent

.60 to .79 +1.2 per cent

.40 to .59 +1.6 per cent

.20 to .39 +2.0 per cent

Less than .20 +2.4 per cent

(b) For calendar years 1985 through 1991 the
contribution rate of any employer eligible for a reduced rate in accordance
with section [383-66(a)(2)] shall be the sum of the employer's basic
contribution rate for such year determined pursuant to this subsection and the
fund solvency contribution rate determined for such year pursuant to subsection
(a); except that no employer's contribution rate shall be less than zero, no
employer's contribution rate shall be greater than five and four-tenths per
cent, and no employer with a negative reserve ratio shall have a contribution
rate less than that employer's basic contribution rate.

Subject to the requirements of sections 383-63
to 383-67 and 383-69, an employer's basic contribution rate for a calendar year
shall be that rate which appears on the same line as the employer's reserve
ratio for the year in the basic contribution rate schedule set forth in this
subsection.

BASIC
CONTRIBUTION RATE SCHEDULE

Reserve Ratio Contribution
Rate

.1500 and over .2 per cent

.1400 to .1499 .4 per cent

.1300 to .1399 .6 per cent

.1200 to .1299 .8 per cent

.1100 to .1199 1.0 per cent

.1000 to .1099 1.2 per cent

.0900 to .0999 1.4 per cent

.0800 to .0899 1.6 per cent

.0700 to .0799 1.8 per cent

.0600 to .0699 2.2 per cent

.0500 to .0599 2.6 per cent

.0300 to .0499 3.0 per cent

.0000 to .0299 3.6 per cent

-.0000 to -.0499 4.2 per cent

-.0500 to -.0999 4.8 per cent

-.1000 and less 5.4 per cent

(c) Effective with calendar year 1992 and
thereafter, before December 31 of the previous year the contribution rate
schedule for the following calendar year shall be determined on the basis of
the relationship between the most recent current reserve fund and the most
recent adequate reserve fund, in accordance with this subsection and subsection
(d).

(1) Whenever the ratio of the current reserve fund to
the adequate reserve fund is greater than 1.69, contribution rate schedule A
shall apply.

(2) Whenever the ratio of the current reserve fund to
the adequate reserve fund is 1.3 to 1.69, contribution rate schedule B shall
apply.

(3) Whenever the ratio of the current reserve fund to
the adequate reserve fund is 1.0 to 1.29, contribution rate schedule C shall
apply.

(4) Whenever the ratio of the current reserve fund to
the adequate reserve fund is .80 to .99, contribution rate schedule D shall
apply.

(5) Whenever the ratio of the current reserve fund to
the adequate reserve fund is .60 to .79, contribution rate schedule E shall
apply.

(6) Whenever the ratio of the current reserve fund to
the adequate reserve fund is .40 to .59, contribution rate schedule F shall
apply.

(7) Whenever the ratio of the current reserve fund to
the adequate reserve fund is .20 to .39, contribution rate schedule G shall
apply.

(8) Whenever the ratio of the current reserve fund to
the adequate reserve fund is less than .20, contribution rate schedule H shall
apply.

Notwithstanding the ratio of the current
reserve fund to the adequate reserve fund, contribution rate schedule D shall
apply for calendar year 2010 and contribution rate schedule F shall apply for
calendar years 2011 and 2012.

(d) Subject to the requirements of sections
383-63 to 383-69, an employer's contribution rate for calendar year 1992 and
for each calendar year thereafter shall be that rate which appears on the same
line as the employer's reserve ratio for that year in the contribution rate
schedule applicable for the year as specified in subsection (c).

CONTRIBUTION
RATE SCHEDULES (rates in percentages)

Reserve Ratio A
B C D E F G H

.1500 and over 0.0 0.0 0.0 0.2 0.6 1.2 1.8 2.4

.1400 to .1499 0.0 0.0 0.1 0.4 0.8 1.4 2.0 2.6

.1300 to .1399 0.0 0.0 0.2 0.6 1.0 1.6 2.2 2.8

.1200 to .1299 0.0 0.1 0.4 0.8 1.2 1.8 2.4 3.0

.1100 to .1199 0.0 0.2 0.6 1.0 1.4 2.0 2.6 3.2

.1000 to .1099 0.1 0.3 0.8 1.2 1.6 2.2 2.8 3.4

.0900 to .0999 0.3 0.5 1.0 1.4 1.8 2.4 3.0 3.6

.0800 to .0899 0.5 0.7 1.2 1.6 2.0 2.6 3.2 3.8

.0700 to .0799 0.7 0.9 1.4 1.8 2.2 2.8 3.4 4.0

.0600 to .0699 0.9 1.1 1.6 2.0 2.4 3.0 3.6 4.2

.0500 to .0599 1.1 1.3 1.8 2.2 2.6 3.2 3.8 4.4

.0300 to .0499 1.3 1.5 2.0 2.6 3.0 3.6 4.2 4.8

.0000 to .0299 1.7 1.9 2.4 3.0 3.4 4.0 4.6 5.2

-.0000 to -.0499 2.1 2.3 2.8 3.4 3.8 4.4 5.0 5.4

-.0500 to -.0999 2.5 2.7 3.2 4.0 4.4 5.0 5.4 5.6

-.1000 to -.4999 2.9 3.1 3.6 4.6 5.0 5.4 5.6 5.8

-.5000 to -.9999 3.4 3.6 4.2 5.2 5.4 5.6 5.8 6.0

-1.0000 to -1.4999 4.1 4.2 4.8 5.4 5.6 5.8 6.0 6.2

-1.5000 to -1.9999 4.7 4.8 5.4 5.6 5.8 6.0 6.2 6.4

-2.0000 and less 5.4 5.4 5.6 5.8 6.0 6.2 6.4 6.6

[L 1939, c 219, §7(c)(3); am L 1941, c 304, §1, pt
of subs 21; RL 1945, §4253; am L 1945, c 19, §1(6); am L 1955, c 16, §1(b); RL
1955, §93-67; am L 1964, c 55, §10; HRS §383-68; am L 1969, c 277, §3; am L
1974, c 155, §2; am L 1978, c 235, §2; am L 1984, c 229, §1; gen ch 1985; am L
1991, c 68, §8; am L 2010, c 2, §5; am L 2012, c 6, §2 and c 263, §2]

Note

The L 2012, c 6, §2 amendment applies retroactively to
January 1, 2012. L 2012, c 6, §7.

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next